District of Columbia statutes.
16-2362

Decrees.

(a)

Every order of the Division terminating the parent and child relationship shall be in writing and shall recite the findings upon which such order is based, including findings pertaining to the court’s jurisdiction.

(b)

Notwithstanding the provisions of § 16-2330, all orders terminating the parent and child relationship entered pursuant to this subchapter shall not be final and effective until the time for noting an appeal has expired and, if a notice of appeal has been entered, the order shall not become effective until the date of the final disposition of the appeal.

Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title IV, § 410, 24 DCR 3341
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 10(kk), 45 DCR 745
1981 Ed., § 16-2362.
1973 Ed., § 16-2362.